02_Morphology/eng.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<noun%>
%<singular%>
%<plural%>

@U.plural_form_s.PL@
@U.plural_form_es.PL@
@U.plural_form_ies.PL@
@U.plural_form_ves.PL@
@U.plural_form_a.PL@

LEXICON Root

! NOUN - NOUN FORM ( Either Singular or Plural )

Day%<noun%>			:Day 	   SFORMS ;
Mountain%<noun%>	:Mountain  SFORMS ;
Chair%<noun%>		:Chair     SFORMS ;
Table%<noun%>		:Table     SFORMS ;
Pencil%<noun%>		:Pencil    SFORMS ;
Book%<noun%>		:Book      SFORMS ;
Cat%<noun%>			:Cat       SFORMS ;
Tax%<noun%>			:Tax      ESFORMS ;
Box%<noun%>			:Box      ESFORMS ;
Mosquito%<noun%>	:Mosquito ESFORMS ;
Echo%<noun%>		:Echo     ESFORMS ;
Lady%<noun%>		:Lad      IESFORMS ;
City%<noun%>		:Cit      IESFORMS ;
Spy%<noun%>			:Sp 	  IESFORMS ;
Army%<noun%>		:Arm      IESFORMS ;
Penny%<noun%>		:Penn     IESFORMS ;
Thief%<noun%>		:Thie     VESFORMS ;
Loaf%<noun%>		:Loa      VESFORMS ;
Half%<noun%>		:Hal      VESFORMS ;
Criterion%<noun%>	:Criteri  AFORMS ;
Phenomenon%<noun%>	:Phenomen AFORMS ;


LEXICON SFORMS

%<singular%>: #;
@U.plural_form_s.PL@%<plural%>:@U.plural_form_s.PL@s # ; 

LEXICON ESFORMS

%<singular%>: #;
@U.plural_form_es.PL@%<plural%>:@U.plural_form_es.PL@es # ; 

LEXICON IESFORMS

%<singular%>:y #;
@U.plural_form_ies.PL@%<plural%>:@U.plural_form_ies.PL@ies # ; 

LEXICON VESFORMS

%<singular%>:f #;
@U.plural_form_ies.PL@%<plural%>:@U.plural_form_ies.PL@ves # ; 

LEXICON AFORMS

%<singular%>:on #;
@U.plural_form_a.PL@%<plural%>:@U.plural_form_a.PL@a # ; 
